Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-6310
Rules and regulations.

The Department
of Economic Development and the Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to administer and enforce the Angel Investment Tax Credit
Act.

Laws 2011, LB389, § 10.